Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.390

Participate. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Participate" means that, with respect to a particular election, an entity:

(1) Makes either a monetary or in-kind contribution to a candidate;

(2) Makes an independent expenditure or electioneering communication in support of or opposition to a candidate;

(3) Endorses a candidate before contributions are made by a subsidiary corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or that candidate's opponent;

(4) Makes a recommendation regarding whether a candidate should be supported or opposed before a contribution is made by a subsidiary corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or that candidate's opponent; or

(5) Directly or indirectly collaborates or consults with a subsidiary corporation or local unit on matters relating to the support of or opposition to a candidate including, but not limited to, the amount of a contribution, when a contribution should be given, and what assistance, services, or independent expenditures, or electioneering communications, if any, will be made or should be made in support of or opposition to a candidate.

[ 2024 c 164 s 239.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.